North Dakota, session 69, HB1490.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new section to chapter 15.1-13 of the North Dakota Century Code is created
and enacted as follows:
School counselor - Psychological evaluation - Student safety.
1. A school counselor licensed under this chapter is not authorized to provide services to
a student without another faculty member present unless:
a. The school counselor has been evaluated by a licensed psychologist approved
by the board;
b. In the professional opinion of the licensed psychologist, the school counselor
does not have a psychological condition or impairment rendering the school
counselor unable to safely and effectively provide services to a student; and
c. The school counselor provides to the board documentation of the professional
opinion of the licensed psychologist under subdivision b in the manner prescribed
by the board.
2. A psychological evaluation under subsection 1 satisfies the requirements of this
section until two years after the date of the psychological evaluation.
Page No. 1 25.0985.01000